Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-1411
Incentive payment; how treated.

An incentive payment made by an insurance carrier in accordance with the Nebraska Right to Shop Act is not an administrative expense of the insurance carrier for rate development or rate filing purposes.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 21.
July 19, 2018